Utah statutes.
76-9-804.   Convicted criminal gang offender -- Prohibition.
(1)  A person who has been convicted of a crime for which the penalty was
enhanced under Section 76-3-203.1 may not, except where a greater penalty is
applicable under this title, possess a dangerous weapon as defined in either
Section 76-1-601 or 76-10-501, ammunition, or a facsimile of a firearm within
five years after the conviction.
(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a class A misdemeanor.
